src/fst/morphology/stems/pronouns.lexc
!! Pronouns
!  --------
!! Pronouns in the Mundurukú language are words that may replace nouns or refer to participants in the conversation.

LEXICON Pronouns
pronoun    Cases   ;
õn+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Nom:õn # ;
ẽn+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Nom:ẽn # ;
wuyju+Pron+Pers+Pl12+Nom:wuyju # ;
oceju+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Nom:oceju # ;
eyju+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Nom:eyju # ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
